Massachusetts, session 194th, H3317.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 142 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 13 the
following section:-
Section 13A. The Uniform State Plumbing Code shall include regulations that allow
gender-neutral toilet and bathing facilities, including toilet and bathing facilities that contain
more than 1 toilet, urinal or shower separated by privacy walls or partitions, with separate or
grouped handwashing fixtures, to be designated or installed in any use group defined in the state
building code, regardless of whether the work being performed is new construction or repair,
renovation or alteration work.
of 1